District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-1806.08

Tax on residents and nonresidents; credits; targeted historic housing credit — Definitions.

Repealed.

History

Apr. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-114, § 302(b)(2), 49 DCR 1468
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-294, § 4, 54 DCR 1086
Sept. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-20, § 2302, 54 DCR 7052

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 4 of Targeted Historic Preservation Assistance Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-500, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 9046).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2302 of Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-74, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7549).

Short Title

Short title: Section 2301 of D.C. Law 17-20 provided that subtitle R of title II of the act may be cited as the “Targeted Historic Tax Credit Repeal Act of 2007”.

Editor's Notes

D.C. Law 17-20, § 2302, made a technical correction in the repeal of this section by D.C. Law 16-294, § 4.

Section 1101 of D.C. Law 14-114 provided: “The Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code § 2-501 et seq.), shall promulgate rules to implement this act.”